Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.560

Weighing devices to be suitable—Testing of weighing and measuring devices.

A licensed public weighmaster shall, in making a weight determination as provided for in this chapter, use a weighing device that conforms to current state legal requirements for commercial devices and is suitable for the weighing of the type and amount of commodity being weighed. The director shall cause to be tested for proper state standards of weight all weighing or measuring devices utilized by any licensed public weighmaster. Certified weights shall not be issued over a device that has been rejected or condemned for use by the director until such device has been repaired and tested as conforming to the intended use requirements.

[ 2017 c 158 s 11; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 27.]